California, session 20252026, AB735.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 65098 of the Government Code is amended to read:65098. As used in this chapter:(a) “21st century warehouse” means a logistics use development that meets all of the following:(1) Complies with or exceeds all requirements of the most current building energy efficiency standards specified in Part 6 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations and the California Green Building Standards Code (Part 11 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations) that are in effect at the time that the building permit is issued, including, but not limited to, the following requirements related to:(A) Photovoltaic system installation and associated battery storage.(B) Cool roofing.(C) Medium- and heavy-duty vehicle charging readiness.(D) Light-duty electric vehicle charging readiness and installed charging stations.(2) Has skylights in at least 1 percent of the roof area, or equivalent LED efficient lighting.(3) (A) Provides conduits and electrical hookups at all loading bays serving cold storage.(B) Idling or use of auxiliary truck engine power to power climate control equipment shall be prohibited if the truck is capable of plugging in at the loading bay and sufficient power is available.(4) Ensures that any heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning is high-efficiency.(5) (A) Ensures that all classes of forklifts used on site, pursuant to State Air Resources Board’s Zero-Emission Forklifts regulation, as drafted, shall be zero-emission by January 1, 2030, to the extent operationally feasible, commercially off-the-shelf available, and adequate power available on site.(B) (i) If not operationally feasible, commercially off-the-shelf available, or if there is inadequate power available on site, the cleanest technology commercially available shall be used.(ii) Cost shall not be a factor in determining operational feasibility pursuant to this subparagraph.(6) (A) Ensures that equipment used on site utilizing small off-road engines shall be zero-emission, to the extent operationally feasible, commercially off-the-shelf available, and adequate power available on site.(B) (i) If not operationally feasible, commercially off-the-shelf available, or if there is inadequate power available on site, the cleanest technology commercially available shall be used.(ii) Cost shall not be a factor in determining operational feasibility pursuant to this subparagraph.(C) Should any equipment used on site utilizing small off-road engines be contracted out, the logistics use development shall preferentially contract for services utilizing zero-emission small off-road engines.(b) “Expansion” means the expansion of an existing logistics use development by 20 percent or more of the existing square footage. Office space shall not be included as part of the existing square footage or in the square footage for the 20-percent expansion threshold.(c) “Heavy-duty truck” means a class 7 or class 8 truck. As used in this subdivision:(1) “Class 7 truck” means a truck with a gross vehicle weight rating of 26,001 to 33,000 pounds.(2) “Class 8 truck” means a truck with a gross vehicle weight rating of greater than 33,000 pounds.(d) “Logistics use development” means a building that is primarily used as a warehouse for the movement or the storage of cargo, goods, or products that are moved to business or retail customers, or both, that does not predominantly serve retail customers for onsite purchases, and heavy-duty trucks are primarily involved in the movement of the cargo, goods, or products. “Logistics use development” does not include any of the following:(1) Facilities where food or household goods are sold directly to consumers and are accessible to the public.(2) A building primarily served by rail to move cargo goods or product.(3) (A) A Strategic Intermodal Facility.(B) For purposes of this subdivision, “Strategic Intermodal Facility” means a project that satisfies all of the following requirements:(i) Logistics facilities, including warehousing and transloading facilities, served by rail.(ii) Intermodal freight transport services.(iii) All facility structures and related rail operations are located within a single site footprint.(4) A building that serves a primary agricultural use that is actively operated for a single period of 90 consecutive days or less each year.(e) “Sensitive receptor” means one or more of the following:(1) A residence, including, but not limited to, a private home, apartment, condominium unit, group home, dormitory unit, or retirement home.(2) A school, including, but not limited to, a preschool, prekindergarten, or school maintaining kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.(3) A daycare facility, including, but not limited to, in-home daycare.(4) (A) Publicly owned parks, playgrounds, and recreational areas or facilities primarily used by children.(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), the following types of park and recreation areas shall not be considered a sensitive receptor:(i) Parks and recreation areas included as a condition of approval for the logistics use development.(ii) Land that will be used to ensure the public’s right of access to the sea, or other public access, pursuant to the California Coastal Act of 1976 (Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000) of the Public Resources Code) or McAteer-Petris Act (Title 7.2 (commencing with Section 66600)).(iii) Land developed at or adjacent to an airport or seaport for the express purpose of creating a buffer area between sensitive receptors and an airport or seaport facility.(5) Nursing homes, long-term care facilities, hospices, convalescent facilities, or similar live-in housing.(6) Hospitals, as defined in Section 128700 of the Health and Safety Code.(f) “Small off-road engines” means spark-ignition engines rated at or below 19 kilowatts or 25 horsepower or less.(g) “Tier 1 21st century warehouse” means a logistics use development that meets all of the following:(1) Complies with or exceeds all requirements of the most current building energy efficiency standards specified in Part 6 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations and the California Green Building Standards Code (Part 11 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations) that are in effect at the time that the building permit is issued, including, but not limited to, the following requirements related to:(A) (i) Photovoltaic system installation and associated battery storage.(ii) For purposes of the photovoltaic system installation requirement in clause (i), all logistic use square footage should be considered conditioned space.(B) Cool roofing.(C) Medium- and heavy-duty vehicle charging readiness.(D) Light-duty electric vehicle charging readiness and installed charging stations.(2) Has skylights in at least one percent of the roof area, or equivalent LED efficient lighting.(3) Has a microgrid-ready switchgear system capable of supporting distributed energy resources.(4) Is advanced smart metering ready.(5) Has a minimum of 50 percent of all passenger vehicle parking spaces preinstalled with conduit and all necessary physical infrastructure to support future charging of electric vehicles.(6) Has a minimum of 10 percent of all passenger vehicle parking spaces installed with electric vehicle charging stations.(7) (A) Provides conduits and electrical hookups at all loading bays serving cold storage.(B) Idling or use of auxiliary truck engine power to power climate control equipment shall be prohibited if the truck is capable of plugging in at the loading bay and sufficient power is available.(8) Ensures that any heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning is high-efficiency.(9) (A) Ensures that all classes of forklifts used on site, pursuant to State Air Resources Board’s Zero-Emission Forklifts regulation, as drafted, shall be zero-emission by January 1, 2028, to the extent operationally feasible, commercially off-the-shelf available, and adequate power available on site.(B) (i) If not operationally feasible, commercially off-the-shelf available, or if there is inadequate power available on site, the cleanest technology commercially available shall be used.(ii) Cost shall not be a factor in determining operational feasibility pursuant to this subparagraph.(10) (A) Ensures that equipment used on site utilizing small off-road engines shall be zero-emission, to the extent operationally feasible, commercially off-the-shelf available, and adequate power available on site.(B) (i) If not operationally feasible, commercially off-the-shelf available, or if there is inadequate power available on site, the cleanest technology commercially available shall be used.(ii) Cost shall not be a factor in determining operational feasibility pursuant to this subparagraph.(C) Should any equipment used on site utilizing small off-road engines be contracted out, the logistics use development shall preferentially contract for services utilizing zero-emission small off-road engines.(h) “Warehouse concentration region” includes the unincorporated areas within the Counties of Riverside and San Bernardino and the Cities of Chino, Colton, Fontana, Jurupa Valley, Moreno Valley, Ontario, Perris, Rancho Cucamonga, Redlands, Rialto, Riverside, and San Bernardino.(i) “Logistics park” means a development consisting of multiple buildings containing logistics use developments.SEC. 2. Section 65098.1 of the Government Code is amended to read:65098.1. (a) Commencing January 1, 2026, any proposed new or expanded logistics use development 250,000 square feet or more where the loading bay is within 900 feet of a sensitive receptor that is utilizing a site zoned for industrial use or any site where an application was submitted to the jurisdiction by September 30, 2024, to rezone as industrial and the rezone to industrial was ultimately approved shall comply with all of the following:(1) Include all Tier 1 21st century warehouse design elements described in subdivision (g) of Section 65098.(2) Orient truck loading bays on the side of the logistics use development that is away from the nearest sensitive receptor, to the extent feasible.(3) Locate truck loading bays a minimum of 300 feet from the property line of the nearest sensitive receptor to the nearest truck loading bay opening using a direct straight-line method.(4) Have a separate entrance to the logistics use development or logistics park for heavy-duty trucks accessible via a truck route, arterial road, major thoroughfare, or a local road that predominantly serves commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses. A separate entrance for heavy-duty trucks may include a driveway with a lane dedicated to heavy-duty trucks and a lane dedicated for other vehicles.(5) Locate truck entry, exit, and internal circulation away from sensitive receptors. Heavy-duty diesel truck drive aisles shall be prohibited from being used on sides of the logistics use development that are directly adjacent to a sensitive receptor property line.(6) Comply with buffering and screening to mitigate for light and noise, as described in Section 65098.2.(b) Commencing January 1, 2026, except as provided for in subdivision (c), any proposed new or expanded logistics use development that is on land that is not zoned industrial, whether developed or undeveloped, or land that needs to be rezoned, where the loading bay is within 900 feet of a sensitive receptor, shall comply with all of the following:(1) If the logistics use development is 250,000 square feet or more it shall include all Tier 1 21st century warehouse design elements described in subdivision (g) of Section 65098. If the logistics use development is less than 250,000 square feet it shall include all 21st century warehouse design elements described in subdivision (a) of Section 65098.(2) Orient truck loading bays on the side of the logistics use development that is away from the nearest sensitive receptor, to the extent feasible.(3) Locate truck loading bays a minimum of 500 feet from the property line of the nearest sensitive receptor to the nearest truck loading bay opening using a direct straight-line method.(4) Have a separate entrance to the logistics use development or logistics park for heavy-duty trucks accessible via a truck route, arterial road, major thoroughfare, or a local road that predominantly serves commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses. A separate entrance for heavy-duty trucks may include a driveway with a lane dedicated to heavy-duty trucks and a lane dedicated to automobiles.(5) Locate truck entry, exit, and internal circulation away from sensitive receptors. Heavy-duty diesel truck drive aisles shall be prohibited from being used on sides of the logistics use development that are directly adjacent to a sensitive receptor property line.(6) Comply with buffering and screening to mitigate for light and noise, as described in Section 65098.2.(c) Commencing January 1, 2026, any proposed new or expanded logistics use development that is on land that is not zoned industrial, whether developed or undeveloped, or land that needs to be rezoned, and is located in the warehouse concentration region, shall comply with all of the following:(1) If the logistics use development is 250,000 square feet or more it shall include all Tier 1 21st century warehouse design elements described in subdivision (g) of Section 65098. If the logistics use development is less than 250,000 square feet it shall include all 21st century warehouse design elements described in subdivision (a) of Section 65098.(2) Orient truck loading bays on the side of the logistics use development that is away from the nearest sensitive receptor, to the extent feasible.(3) Locate truck loading bays a minimum of 500 feet from the property line of the nearest sensitive receptor to the nearest truck loading bay opening using a direct straight-line method.(4) Have a separate entrance to the logistics use development or logistics park for heavy-duty trucks accessible via a truck route, arterial road, major thoroughfare, or a local road that predominantly serves commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses. A separate entrance for heavy-duty trucks may include a driveway with a lane dedicated to heavy-duty trucks and a lane dedicated to automobiles.(5) Locate truck entry, exit, and internal circulation away from sensitive receptors. Heavy-duty diesel truck drive aisles shall be prohibited from being used on sides of the logistics use development that are directly adjacent to a sensitive receptor property line.(6) Comply with buffering and screening to mitigate for light and noise, as described in Section 65098.2.(d) Commencing January 1, 2026, any proposed new or expanded logistics use development less than 250,000 square feet where the loading bay is within 900 feet of a sensitive receptor that is utilizing a site zoned for industrial use or any site where an application was submitted to the jurisdiction by September 30, 2024, to rezone as industrial and the rezone to industrial was ultimately approved shall comply with all of the following:(1) Orient truck loading bays on the side of the logistics use development that is away from the nearest sensitive receptor, to the extent feasible.(2) Locate truck entry, exit, and internal circulation away from sensitive receptors. Heavy-duty diesel truck drive aisles shall be prohibited from being used on sides of the logistics use development that are directly adjacent to a sensitive receptor property line.(3) Comply with buffering and screening to mitigate for light and noise, as described in Section 65098.2.(4) Complies with or exceeds all requirements of the most current building energy efficiency standards specified in Part 6 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations and the California Green Building Standards Code (Part 11 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations) that are in effect at the time that the building permit is issued, including, but not limited to, the following requirements related to:(A) Photovoltaic system installation and associated battery storage.(B) Cool roofing.(C) Medium- and heavy-duty vehicle charging readiness.(D) Light-duty electric vehicle charging readiness and installed charging stations.(5) (A) Provides conduits at loading bays equal to one truck per every loading bay serving cold storage.(B) Idling or use of auxiliary truck engine power to power climate control equipment shall be prohibited if the truck is capable of plugging in at the loading bay and sufficient power is available.(6) Ensures that any heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning is high-efficiency.(7) Have a separate entrance for heavy-duty trucks accessible via a truck route, arterial road, major thoroughfare, or a local road that predominantly serves commercial oriented uses.(e) For purposes of this section, “rezone” does not include land that meets both of the following requirements:(1) The land is annexed by a jurisdiction through a boundary change.(2) The zoning in the new jurisdiction is consistent with the zoning assigned by the original jurisdiction.SEC. 3. Section 65098.1.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:65098.1.5. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in Section 65098.1.6, any existing logistics use development in existence as of September 30, 2024, shall not be subject to the requirements described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of, paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 65098.1, as applicable, if a new sensitive receptor is constructed, established, or permitted after the effective date of this chapter.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in Section 65098.1.6, if by September 30, 2024, a proposed expansion of a logistics use development is in a local entitlement process, then the proposed expansion shall not be subject to the requirements described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of, paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 65098.1, as applicable, if a sensitive receptor is constructed, established, or permitted after the effective date of this chapter.(3) Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in Section 65098.1.6, if by September 30, 2024, a property is currently in a local entitlement process to become a logistics use development, then the proposed logistics use development shall not be subject to the requirements described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of, paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 65098.1, as applicable, if a sensitive receptor is constructed, established, or permitted after the effective date of this chapter.(b) (1) Any proposed new logistics use developments that require the rezoning of land and must undergo a municipal entitlement process shall not be subject to the requirements described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of, paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 65098.1, as applicable, if the start of the entitlement process for the logistics use development began before any sensitive receptor started its own entitlement or permitting process, unless the proposed sensitive receptor was an existing allowable use according to local zoning regulations.(2) During a logistics use development’s entitlement process for a new or expanded logistics use development, if a new sensitive receptor is proposed or established within the distances required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of, paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 65098.1, as applicable, then those distance requirements shall not apply to the logistics use development so long as the logistics use development was not already subject to those requirements prior to the new sensitive receptor being proposed or established. (c) The protection afforded by this section shall remain in effect from the time of the initial application submission through the completion of the entitlement process, including any necessary rezoning actions and through the development period. If no construction activity occurs within five years of entitlement approvals, the protections shall be waived.SEC. 4. Section 65098.1.6 is added to the Government Code, to read:65098.1.6. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, this chapter shall not apply to any logistics use development that was subject to a local entitlement process that began before September 30, 2024.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, this chapter shall not apply to a logistics use development that received an approval by a local agency before the date upon which this chapter became effective.(c) For purposes of this section, “approval” shall have the same meaning as is set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 15352 of Chapter 3 of Division 6 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.SEC. 5. Section 65098.2 of the Government Code is amended to read:65098.2. (a) Any new logistics use development within 900 feet of a sensitive receptor shall have a buffer as follows:(1) If the logistics use development is subject to the requirements of subdivision (a) or (d) of Section 65098.1, the buffer shall be 50 feet in width measured from the property line of all adjacent sensitive receptors that, in accordance with subdivisions (b) and (c), fully screen the logistics use development from the sensitive receptor.(2) If the logistics use development is subject to either subdivision (b) or subdivision (c) of Section 65098.1, the buffer shall be 100 feet in width measured from the property line of all adjacent sensitive receptors that, in accordance with subdivisions (b) and (c), fully screen the logistics use development from the sensitive receptor.(b) Buffer areas shall include a solid decorative wall, landscaped berm and wall, or landscaped berm 10 feet or more in height, drought tolerant natural ground landscaping with proper irrigation, and solid-screen buffering trees as described in subdivision (c) and may include other hardscape, access, and passenger vehicle parking improvements.(c) Trees shall be used as part of a solid-screen buffering treatment and planted in two rows along the length of the property line adjacent to the sensitive receptor. Trees used for this purpose shall be evergreen, drought tolerant, to the extent feasible, composed of species with low biogenic emissions, of a minimum 36-inch box size at planting, and spaced at no greater distance than 40 feet on center. Palm trees shall not be utilized. The buffer area may include any landscaped areas within a public right-of-way or public or private pedestrian walkways.(d)A city, county, or city and county shall not adopt or enforce any ordinance, standard, rule, or regulation that would have the effect of physically precluding a logistics use development from complying with any of the requirements set forth in this chapter.SEC. 6. Section 65098.2.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:65098.2.5. The entry gates into the loading truck court for a new or expanded logistics use development shall be positioned after a minimum of 50 feet of total available stacking depth inside the property line. The stacking depth shall be increased by 70 feet for every 20 loading bays beyond 50 loading bays, to the extent feasible.SEC. 7. Section 65098.2.7 of the Government Code is amended to read:65098.2.7. (a) The purpose of this section is to ensure that logistics use developments, beginning January 1, 2026, are sited in locations that minimize adverse impacts on residential communities and enhance transportation efficiency. This is achieved by restricting logistics use development to roadways that are suited to handle the associated traffic and that predominantly serve commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses.(b) (1) Any new logistics use development shall be sited on roadways that meet the following classifications:(A) Arterial roads.(B) Collector roads.(C) Major thoroughfares.(D) Local roads that predominantly serve commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses.(2) For purposes of this chapter, local roads shall be considered to predominantly serve commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses if more than 50 percent of the properties fronting the road within 1,000 feet of the site’s truck entrances and exits are designated for commercial, agricultural, or industrial use according to the local zoning ordinance.(c) A waiver may be granted where siting on the designated roadways pursuant to subdivision (b) is impractical due to unique geographic, economic, or infrastructure-related reasons. The waiver shall be approved by the city, county, or city and county, provided that the applicant demonstrates all of the following:(1) There is no feasible alternative site that exists within the designated roadways.(2) A traffic analysis has been completed and submitted to the local approving authority.(3) The site is an existing industrial zone or an existing industrial or agricultural zone for an agricultural-related logistics use project.(4) The proposed site will incorporate mitigations to minimize traffic and environmental impacts on residential areas to the greatest extent feasible.SEC. 8. Section 65098.2.8 is added to the Government Code, to read:65098.2.8. (a) Except as specified in subdivision (b), a jurisdiction that is not in a warehouse concentration region shall adopt an ordinance, on or before January 1, 2028, that shall do all of the following:(1) Identify and establish specific travel routes for the transport of goods, materials, or freight for storage, transfer, or redistribution to safely accommodate additional truck traffic and avoid residential areas and sensitive receptors, as defined in Section 65098.(2) Maximize the use of interstate or divided highways as preferred routes for truck routes. The county or city shall also maximize use of arterial roads, major thoroughfares, and local roads that predominantly serve commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses when state or interstate highways are not utilized. Truck routes shall comply with all of the following.(A) Major or minor collector streets and local roads that predominantly serve commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses shall be used for truck routes only when strictly necessary to reach existing industrial zones.(B) Trucks shall be routed via transportation arteries that minimize exposure to sensitive receptors.(C) On and after January 1, 2028, or January 1, 2030, for a jurisdiction that is subject to subdivision (b), all proposed development of a logistics use development, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 65098, shall be accessible via arterial roads, major thoroughfares, or local roads that predominantly serve commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses.(i) The purpose of this section is to ensure that logistics use development are sited in locations that minimize adverse impacts on residential communities and enhance transportation efficiency. This is achieved by restricting logistics use developments to roadways that are suited to handle the associated traffic and that predominantly serve commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses.(ii) For purposes of this section, local roads shall be considered to predominantly serve commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses if more than 50 percent of the properties fronting the road within 1,000 feet are designed for commercial, agricultural, or industrial use according to the local zoning ordinance.(D) Notwithstanding any other provision in this paragraph, an ordinance may, but is not required to, regulate traffic from a primary agricultural use facility, located in that jurisdiction. For purposes of this subparagraph, a primary agricultural use facility means a logistics use facility that is less than 20,000 square feet, located in an unincorporated area, in which one or more agricultural commodities or forest products is produced, processed, or packaged, and that may include storage of those commodities or products incidental to production, processing, or packaging.(b) A jurisdiction that is a city with a population that is equal to, or less than, 50,000 persons or a county with a population that is equal to, or less than, 100,000 persons shall adopt the ordinance required pursuant to subdivision (a) on or before January 1, 2030.(c) The city or county may consult with the Department of Transportation and the California Freight Advisory Committee for technical assistance.(d) The city or county shall provide for posting of conspicuous signage to identify truck routes and additional signage for truck parking and appropriate idling facility locations.(e) The city or county shall make truck routes publicly available in geographic information system (GIS) format and share GIS maps of the truck routes with warehouse operators, fleet operators, and truck drivers.(f) The city or county shall provide opportunities for the involvement of citizens, California Native American Indian tribes, public agencies, public utility companies, and civic, educational, and other community groups through public hearings and any other means that the planning agency deems appropriate, consistent with Section 65351.(g) The city or county shall make a diligent effort to achieve public participation of all economic segments of the community in the development of the changes required pursuant to this section.(h) The requirement to adopt an ordinance pursuant to this section shall not apply to a city, county, or city and county that as of January 1, 2025, did not have any logistics use development within its jurisdiction. If any proposed new logistics use development is approved within a jurisdiction after January 1, 2025, a city, county, or city and county shall comply with the requirements in this section within two years after the date of final approval of a logistics use development.(i) (1) In an action brought by the Attorney General against a An action may be brought by the Attorney General against a city, county, or city and county that is in violation of this section. A city, county, or city and county that has been found by a court to be in violation of this section shall be subject to any of the following:(A) A civil penalty of up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) every six months, accrued from the date of the violation until the violation is cured.(B) Costs of investigating and prosecuting this action, including expert fees, reasonable attorney’s fees, and costs.(C) Other relief deemed appropriate by the court, including equitable and injunctive relief.(2) In determining the application of the remedies available under this section, the court shall consider whether there are any mitigating circumstances delaying the jurisdiction from coming into compliance with this section. The court may consider whether a city, county, or city and county is making a good faith effort to come into substantial compliance or is facing substantial undue hardships.(j) Civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the office of the Attorney General. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, any civil penalties collected pursuant subdivision (i) shall be distributed by the Attorney General and returned to the local air quality management district in which the civil penalty was imposed for the district’s efforts to improve air quality.SEC. 9. Section 65098.3 of the Government Code is amended to read:65098.3. (a) Anti-idling signs indicating a three-minute heavy-duty truck engine idling restriction shall be posted at logistics use developments along entrances to the site and at the truck loading bays.(b) Signs shall be installed at all heavy-duty truck exit driveways directing truck drivers to the truck route as indicated in the truck routing plan, as described in Section 65098.4, and to the state highway system.SEC. 10. Section 65098.4 of the Government Code is amended to read:65098.4. (a) Prior to the issuance of a certificate of occupancy, a logistics use development operator shall establish and submit for approval to the planning director or equivalent position for the city, county, or city and county a truck routing plan to and from the state highway system based on the latest truck route map of the city, county, or city and county. The truck routing plan shall describe the operational characteristics of the logistic use and of the logistics use development operator, including, but not limited to, hours of operation, types of items to be stored within the building, and proposed truck routing to and from the logistics use development to designated truck routes that, to the greatest extent possible, avoid passing sensitive receptors. The truck routing plan shall include measures, such as signage and pavement markings, and queuing analysis for preventing truck queuing, circling, stopping, and parking on public streets. The logistics use development operator shall be responsible for communication of the truck routing plan internally and to external parties who may dispatch trucks to the facility.(b) A revised truck routing plan shall be submitted to the planning director or equivalent position prior to a business license being issued by the city, county, or city and county for any new tenant of the property. The planning director or equivalent position shall have discretion to determine if changes to the truck routing plan are necessary, including, but not limited to, any additional measures to alleviate truck routing and parking issues that may arise during the life of the logistics use development.(c) This section shall not be construed to expand or restrict any authority that the planning director may have pursuant to any local ordinance or regulation to regulate hours of operation.SEC. 11. Section 65098.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:65098.5. (a) A city, county, or city and county shall not approve development of a logistics use development that does not meet or exceed the standards outlined in this chapter.(b) A city, county, or city and county shall not adopt or enforce any ordinance, standard, rule, or regulation to the extent that the ordinance, standard, rule, or regulation would prohibit or have the effect of physically precluding any physical feature of a logistics use development that is required by paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 65098, paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (g) of Section 65098, paragraphs (1), (4), and (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 65098.1, paragraphs (1), (4), and (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 65098.1, paragraphs (1), (4), and (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 65098.1, paragraphs (3) to (5), inclusive, and paragraph (7) of subdivision (d) of Section 65098.1, Section 65098.2, or Section 65098.2.5. (b)(c) This section shall not be construed to restrict the existing authority of a city, county, or city and county to deny a logistics use development altogether. do either of the following:(1) Deny a logistics use development altogether.(2) Adopt or enforce an ordinance, standard, rule, or regulation that prohibits or has the effect of physically precluding a new logistics use development or the expansion of a logistics use development on any parcel.SEC. 12. Section 65098.6 of the Government Code is amended to read:65098.6. A city, county, or city and county shall condition approval of a logistics use development on the following:(a) Two-to-one replacement of any demolished housing unit that was occupied within the last 10 years, unless the housing unit was declared substandard by a building official, pursuant to Section 17920.3 of the Health and Safety Code, prior to purchase by the developer. For each housing unit demolished, regardless of market value of the unit, two units of affordable housing for persons and families of low or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, that are deed-restricted shall be built within the jurisdiction. Funds from any fee imposed for the replacement of demolished housing units shall be placed in a housing-specific set-aside account and shall be used for housing within three years of collection.(b) If residential dwellings are affected through purchase, the developer shall be required to provide any displaced tenant with an amount equivalent to 12 months’ rent at the current rate.(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or preclude the applicability of Article 2 (commencing with Section 66300.5) of Chapter 12 to logistics uses. A logistics use that is subject to Article 2 (commencing with Section 66300.5) of Chapter 12 shall first comply with that article. Any additional replacement housing obligations or payments to displaced tenants that are not required pursuant to that article shall comply with this section.SEC. 13. Section 65302.02 of the Government Code is amended to read:65302.02. (a) A county or city that is located in a warehouse concentration region, as defined in Section 65098, shall update its circulation element, as required by subdivision (b) of Section 65302, to do all of the following on or before January 1, 2026.(1) Identify and establish specific travel routes for the transport of goods, materials, or freight for storage, transfer, or redistribution to safely accommodate additional truck traffic and avoid residential areas and sensitive receptors, as defined by Section 65098.(2) Maximize the use of interstate or state divided highways as preferred routes for truck routes. The county or city shall also maximize use of arterial roads, major thoroughfares, and local roads that predominantly serve commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses when state or interstate highways are not utilized. Truck routes shall comply with the following:(A) Major or minor collector streets and local roads that predominantly serve commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses shall be used for truck routes only when strictly necessary to reach existing industrial zones.(B) Trucks shall be routed via transportation arteries that minimize exposure to sensitive receptors.(b) On and after January 1, 2028, all proposed development of a logistics use development, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 65098, shall be accessible via arterial roads, major thoroughfares, or local roads that predominantly serve commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses.(c) The purpose of this section is to ensure that logistics use developments are sited in locations that minimize adverse impacts on residential communities and enhance transportation efficiency. This is achieved by restricting logistics use developments to roadways that are suited to handle the associated traffic and that predominantly serve commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses.(d) For purposes of this section, local roads shall be considered to predominantly serve commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses if more than 50 percent of the properties fronting the road within 1,000 feet of the truck entrances and exits are designated for commercial, agricultural, or industrial use according to the local zoning ordinance.(e) The county or city may consult with the Department of Transportation and the California Freight Advisory Committee for technical assistance.(f) The county or city shall provide for posting of conspicuous signage to identify truck routes and additional signage for truck parking and appropriate locations for idling and parking.(g) The county or city shall make truck routes publicly available in geographic information system (GIS) format and share GIS maps of the truck routes with warehouse operators, fleet operators, and truck drivers.(h) The city or county shall provide opportunities for the involvement of citizens, California Native American Indian tribes, public agencies, public utility companies, and civic, educational, and other community groups through public hearings and any other means the planning agency deems appropriate, consistent with Section 65351.(i) The city or county shall make a diligent effort to achieve public participation of all economic segments of the community in the development of the changes required pursuant to this section.(j) (1) An action may be brought by the Attorney General against a jurisdiction that is in violation of this section. A city, county, or city and county found by the courts a court to be in violation of this section shall be subject to any of the following:(A) A civil penalty of up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) every six months, accrued from the date of the violation until the violation is cured.(B) All costs of investigating and prosecuting this action, including expert fees, reasonable attorney’s fees, and costs.(C) Other relief deemed appropriate by the court, including equitable and injunctive relief.(2) In determining the application of the remedies available pursuant to this section, the court shall consider whether there are any mitigating circumstances delaying the jurisdiction from coming into compliance with this section. The court may consider whether a city, county, or city and county is making a good faith effort to come into substantial compliance or is facing substantial undue hardship. (k) Civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the office of the Attorney General. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, any civil penalties collected pursuant to subdivision (j), shall be distributed by the Attorney General and returned to the local air quality management district in which the civil penalty was imposed for the district’s efforts to improve air quality.SEC. 14. Section 40458.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:40458.5. (a) Subject to an appropriation for this express purpose, the South Coast Air Quality Management District shall, beginning on January 1, 2026, and until January 1, 2032, deploy mobile air monitoring systems within the Counties of Riverside and San Bernardino to collect air pollution measurements in communities that are near operational logistics use developments.(b)The South Coast Air Quality Management District shall use the data collected pursuant to subdivision (a) to conduct an air modeling analysis to evaluate the impact of air pollution on sensitive receptors, as defined in Section 65098 of the Government Code, from logistics use development operations in the Counties of Riverside and San Bernardino, including relative pollution concentrations from logistics use developments at varying distances from sensitive receptors.(b) Based on the amount of appropriated funds, the district may use a combination of new air monitoring data or other measurement data to evaluate pollutant concentrations at varying distances away from new logistics use projects.(c) The South Coast Air Quality Management District shall submit its findings to the Legislature on or before January 1, 2033. On or before January 1, 2028, the South Coast Air Quality Management District shall submit an interim report to evaluate the impact of air pollution on sensitive receptors, as defined in Section 65098 of the Government Code, from logistics use development operations in the Counties of Riverside and San Bernardino, including relative pollution concentrations from logistics use developments at varying distances from sensitive receptors. This report shall be used to assess the effectiveness of setbacks on public health.(d) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed pursuant to subdivision (c) is inoperative on January 1, 2040, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 15. Section 40522.7 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:40522.7. The South Coast Air Quality Management District shall establish a process for receiving community input on how any penalties assessed and collected for violations of the Warehouse Indirect Source Rule are spent. The South Coast Air Quality Management District shall ensure a wide range of community groups are included in the process and that groups represent the geographic areas where there are high numbers of warehouse facilities.SEC. 16. Section 2429.9 is added to the Vehicle Code, immediately following Section 2429.7, to read:2429.9. (a) On or before January 1, 2027, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall make the following available to city and county law enforcement agencies subject to this section:(1) At no charge, training on enforcement of laws related to commercial vehicles, as defined in Section 260 of the California Vehicle Code, including, but not limited to, truck route enforcement.(2) Course completion certificates for city and county law enforcement personnel who have completed the training described in paragraph (1).(b) All jurisdictions that are required to update a circulation element or to adopt an ordinance pursuant to Section 65098.1 of the Government Code shall have at least one enforcement officer that has received a completion certificate pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) by the date upon which that circulation element is updated or ordinance is adopted.(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the department to provide training for which it has not received funding or to require a jurisdiction to have an enforcement officer that has received a course completion certificate if the department has not made the training described in subdivision (a) available to law enforcement personnel at no charge.SEC. 17. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.